Utah statutes.
34-20a-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Fire fighters" means the full-time, salaried, members of any regularly constituted fire department in any city, town, or county.

(2)  "Corporate authorities" means the council, commission, or other governing body of any city, town, or county which fixes hours, wages, salaries, and other conditions of employment. 



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

